Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
Early Childhood Education and Development

12.400.
Legislative intent — Office of early childhood education and development established — Functions — Special assistant. [Repealed.]

12.401.
Office of Early Childhood Development. [Repealed.]

12.410.
Governor’s interagency council on early childhood education and development established — Functions — Members. [Repealed.]

12.420.
Interagency advisory committee established — Members — Meetings — Operating expenses. [Repealed.]